Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-268
Weeds; destruction
and removal; procedure.

A city of the primary class may provide
for the destruction and removal of weeds and worthless vegetation growing
upon any lot or lots or lands within the corporate limits of such city or
upon the streets and alleys abutting upon any lot or lots or lands, and such
city may require the owner or owners of such lot or lots or lands to destroy
and remove the same therefrom and from the streets and alleys abutting thereon.
If, after five days' notice by publication, by
certified United States mail, or
by the conspicuous posting of the notice on the lot or land upon which the
nuisance exists, the owner or owners fail, neglect, or refuse to
destroy or remove the nuisance, the city, through
its proper officers, shall destroy and remove the nuisance, or
cause the nuisance to be destroyed or
removed, from the
lot or lots or lands and streets and alleys abutting thereon and shall assess
the cost thereof against such lot or lots or lands, as provided by ordinance.

Laws 1915, c. 215, § 1, p. 484;

C.S.1922, § 3863;

C.S.1929, § 15-266;

R.S.1943, § 15-268;

Laws 1988, LB 973, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB495, § 2.

This section provides local governing bodies with adequate limitations and standards for carrying out the statute's duties. Thus, the statute does not violate constitutional standards regarding delegations of legislative powers. Howard v. City of Lincoln, 243 Neb. 5, 497 N.W.2d 53 (1993).

It is the duty of city to destroy weeds if owner does not. Greenwood v. City of Lincoln, 156 Neb. 142, 55 N.W.2d 343 (1952).